Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2214.02
Records and information; disclosure prohibited; exceptions.

No record of any person receiving any services funded through the department and no information of a sensitive or confidential nature may be disclosed or released to any other party without the written consent of the person or his or her legal representative unless the disclosure is required for the furtherance of purposes directly associated with the person's plan for services, is required by court order, or is necessary for program monitoring by authorized federal, state, or local monitoring agencies, including the department and the Legislature, or for purposes of the Adult Protective Services Act.

Laws 1991, LB 58, § 17.

Adult Protective Services Act, see section 28-348.